New Jersey, session 222, A4794.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.54:50-8 is amended to read as follows: 54:50-8.  a.  The records and files of the director respecting the administration of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law or of any State tax law, or respecting the administration of the Stay NJ property tax credit, the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program, and the homestead property tax reimbursement program, shall be considered confidential and privileged and neither the director nor any employee engaged in the administration thereof or charged with the custody of any such records or files, nor any former officer or employee, nor any person who may have secured information therefrom under subsection d., e., f., g., p., q., r., [or] s., t., u., or v. of R.S.54:50-9 or any other provision of State law, shall divulge, disclose, use for their own personal advantage, or examine for any reason other than a reason necessitated by the performance of official duties any information obtained from the said records or files or from any examination or inspection of the premises or property of any person.  Neither the director nor any employee engaged in such administration or charged with the custody of any such records or files shall be required to produce any of them for the inspection of any person or for use in any action or proceeding except when the records or files or the facts shown thereby are directly involved in an action or proceeding under the provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law or of the State tax law affected, or where the determination of the action or proceeding will affect the validity or amount of the claim of the State under some State tax law, or in any lawful proceeding for the investigation and prosecution of any violation of the criminal provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law or of any State tax law. b.    The prohibitions of this section, against unauthorized disclosure, use or examination by any present or former officer or employee of this State or any other individual having custody of such information obtained pursuant to the explicit authority of State law, shall specifically include, without limitation, violations involving the divulgence or examination of any information from or any copy of a federal return or federal return information required by New Jersey law to be attached to or included in any New Jersey return.  Any person violating this section by divulging, disclosing or using information shall be guilty of a crime of the fourth degree.  Any person violating this section by examining records or files for any reason other than a reason necessitated by the performance of official duties shall be guilty of a disorderly persons offense. c.     Whenever records and files are used in connection with the prosecution of any person for violating the provisions of this section by divulging, disclosing or using records or files or examining records and files for any reason other than a reason necessitated by the performance of official duties, the defendant shall be given access to those records and files.  The court shall review such records and files in camera, and that portion of the court record containing the records and files shall be sealed by the court. (cf:  P.L.2024, c.88, s.21) 2.    R.S.54:50-9 is amended to read as follows: 54:50-9.  Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prevent: a.     The delivery to a taxpayer or the taxpayer's duly authorized representative of a copy of any report or any other paper filed by the taxpayer pursuant to the provisions of this subtitle or of any such State tax law; b.    The publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of a particular report and the items thereof; c.     The director, in the director's discretion and subject to reasonable conditions imposed by the director, from disclosing the name and address of any licensee under any State tax law, unless expressly prohibited by such State tax law; d.    The inspection by the Attorney General or other legal representative of this State of the reports or files relating to the claim of any taxpayer who shall bring an action to review or set aside any tax imposed under any State tax law or against whom an action or proceeding has been instituted in accordance with the provisions thereof; e.     The examination of said records and files by the Comptroller, State Auditor or State Commissioner of Finance, or by their respective duly authorized agents; f.     The furnishing, at the discretion of the director, of any information contained in tax reports or returns or any audit thereof or the report of any investigation made with respect thereto, filed pursuant to the tax laws, to the taxing officials of any other state, the District of Columbia, the United States and the territories thereof, providing said jurisdictions grant like privileges to this State and providing such information is to be used for tax purposes only; g.    The furnishing, at the discretion of the director, of any material information disclosed by the records or files to any law enforcing authority of this State who shall be charged with the investigation or prosecution of any violation of the criminal provisions of this subtitle or of any State tax law; h.    The furnishing by the director to the State agency responsible for administering the Child Support Enforcement program pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, Pub.L.93-647 (42 U.S.C. s.651 et seq.), with the names, home addresses, social security numbers and sources of income and assets of all absent parents who are certified by that agency as being required to pay child support, upon request by the State agency and pursuant to procedures and in a form prescribed by the director; i.     The furnishing by the director to the Board of Public Utilities any information contained in tax information statements, reports or returns or any audit thereof or a report of any investigation made with respect thereto, as may be necessary for the administration of P.L.1991, c.184 (C.54:30A-18.6 et al.) and P.L.1997, c.162 (C.54:10A-5.25 et al.); j.     The furnishing by the director to the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control in the Department of Law and Public Safety any information contained in tax information statements, reports or returns or any audit thereof or a report of any investigation made with respect thereto, as may be relevant, in the discretion of the director, in any proceeding conducted for the issuance, suspension or revocation of any license authorized pursuant to Title 33 of the Revised Statutes; k.    The inspection by the Attorney General or other legal representative of this State of the reports or files of any tobacco product manufacturer, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1999, c.148 (C.52:4D-2), for any period in which that tobacco product manufacturer was not or is not in compliance with subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1999, c.148 (C.52:4D-3), or of any licensed distributor as defined in section 102 of P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-2), for the purpose of facilitating the administration of the provisions of P.L.1999, c.148 (C.52:4D-1 et seq.); l.     The furnishing, at the discretion of the director, of information as to whether a contractor or subcontractor holds a valid business registration as defined in section 1 of P.L.2001, c.134 (C.52:32-44); m.   The furnishing by the director to a State agency as defined in section 1 of P.L.1995, c.158 (C.54:50-24) the names of licensees subject to suspension for non-payment of State tax indebtedness pursuant to P.L.2004, c.58 (C.54:50-26.1 et al.); n.    The release to the United States Department of the Treasury, Bureau of Financial Management Service, or its successor of relevant taxpayer information for purposes of implementing a reciprocal collection and offset of indebtedness agreement entered into between the State of New Jersey and the federal government pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2006, c.32 (C.54:49-12.7); o.    The examination of said records and files by the Commissioner of Health and Senior Services, the Commissioner of Human Services, the Medicaid Inspector General, or their respective duly authorized agents, pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2007, c.217 (C.26:2H-18.60e), section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3), or section 5 of P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-12); p.    The furnishing at the discretion of the director of employer-provided wage and tax withholding information contained in tax reports or returns filed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:7-2, 54A:7-4 and 54A:7-7, to the designated municipal officer of a municipality authorized to impose an employer payroll tax pursuant to the provisions of Article 5 (Employer Payroll Tax) of the "Local Tax Authorization Act," P.L.1970, c.326 (C.40:48C-14 et seq.), for the limited purpose of verifying the payroll information reported by employers subject to the employer payroll tax; q.    The furnishing by the director to the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development of any information, including, but not limited to, tax information statements, reports, audit files, returns, or reports of any investigation for the purpose of labor market research or assisting in investigations pursuant to any State wage, benefit or tax law as enumerated in section 1 of P.L.2009, c.194 (C.34:1A-1.11); or pursuant to P.L.1940, c.153 (C.34:2-21.1 et seq.). r.     The furnishing by the director to the New Jersey Economic Development Authority any information contained in tax information statements, reports or returns, or any audit thereof or a report of any investigation made with respect thereto, as may be relevant to assist the authority in the implementation of programs through which grants, loans, tax credits, or other forms of financial assistance are provided.  The director shall provide to the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, upon request, such information. s.     The furnishing by the director to the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance of any information, including, but not limited to, tax information statements, reports, audit files, returns, or reports of any investigation for the purpose of assisting in investigations pursuant to any insurance fraud investigation as enumerated in P.L.1983, c.320 (C.17:33A-1 et seq.). t.     The furnishing by the director to the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance or the Commissioner of Human Services of any information contained in tax reports or returns for the purpose of determining a taxpayer's eligibility for insurance affordability assistance, the State Medicaid program, or the NJ FamilyCare Program and to otherwise support minimum essential coverage outreach and enrollment efforts. u.    The furnishing by the director to the New Jersey Innovation Authority of any information contained in tax reports or returns for the purpose of supporting the Division of Taxation in improving the customer experience of taxpayers and the public by evaluating and improving taxation processes. v.    The furnishing by the director to the New Jersey Secure Choice Savings Board of any information contained in tax reports or returns that is necessary for the purposes of P.L.2019, c.56 (C.43:23-13 et seq.). (cf:  P.L.2022, c.39, s.10) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.